Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1074.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. Classroom management; removal of students; readmission; administrative action; definitions A. If a teacher removes a student from a classroom pursuant to rules governing student conduct, the principal or designated school administrator may direct the student to return to the classroom only if the principal or administrator provides to the teacher a written or electronic certification that both: 1. States that the PRINCIPAL or administrator is authorizing the student to be readmitted to the classroom. 2. Describes the disciplinary action, if any, that was taken in response to the behavior for which the student was removed. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Classroom" means any area in which regularly scheduled instruction is provided to students by a certificated employee of a public school. 2. "Rules governing student conduct": (a) Means any rules, procedures, policies or guidelines that outline the expectations for student behavior while attending school and the disciplinary actions that may be taken if a student's behavior does not meet those expectations. (b) Includes policies and procedures adopted by a school district governing board or charter school governing body, procedures developed by schools relating to student discipline and the temporary removal of students from a classroom, classroom management plans developed by teachers and school administrators, student handbooks and parent-teacher handbooks. END_STATUTE